Utah statutes.
48-2c-104 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Separate legal entity.

A company formed under this chapter is a legal entity distinct from its members.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

